Utah statutes.
77-5-6.   Suspension on filing articles -- Vacancy, how filled.
When articles of impeachment are presented to the Senate, and the officer has
been served with a copy of the articles, he shall be temporarily suspended
from his office and may not exercise his duties until he is acquitted.  Upon
the suspension of any officer, other than the governor, or a justice or judge
of a court of record, his office shall be temporarily filled by an appointment
made by the governor, with the consent of the Senate, until the acquittal of
the party impeached, or, in the case of his removal, until the vacancy is
filled at the next election as provided by law.
